Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9306
Civil action.

Any home care consumer who suffers a loss or harm as a result of a violation of the Home Care Consumer Bill of Rights Act may file a civil action to recover actual damages, attorney’s fees, court costs, and any other remedies provided by law.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 6.